Utah statutes.
61-6-11.   Shares subject to redemption.
(1)  If authorized in a corporation's articles of incorporation or bylaws
before a control share acquisition has occurred, an issuing public corporation
may redeem, at fair market value, control shares acquired in a control share
acquisition with respect to which no acquiring person statement has been filed
with the issuing public corporation.  Any such redemption shall be consummated
according to the procedures adopted by the corporation and shall take place at
any time within 60 days after the last acquisition of control shares by the
acquiring person.
(2)  Control shares acquired in a control share acquisition are not subject to
redemption after an acquiring person statement has been filed, unless the
shares are not accorded full voting rights by the shareholders as provided in
Section 61-6-10.
